Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
(1)The State Board of Law Examiners shall be deemed to be a regulatory agency having specific statutory access to the records of the center as provided by subsection (a) of this section.

The center shall provide access to the insurance verification database that contains the information provided to the Department of Finance and Administration or to a vendor designated by the department under § 27-22-107 to law enforcement officers during the course of traffic stops.

A person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor upon conviction if the person knowingly:

A person is guilty of a Class D felony upon conviction if the person violates subsection (a) of this section for the purpose of:

Political purposes for the person or a member of the person's family.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207(b) and Acts 2011, No. 779, § 25, the amendments to this section by Acts 2011, No. 779, § 7 are superseded by the amendments to this section by Acts 2011, No. 1224, § 1.

Acts 2011, No. 1224, § 3, provided:

“The provisions of this act shall not be retroactive.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment by No. 779 substituted “knowingly releases or discloses” for “shall release or disclose” and “upon conviction is guilty” for “shall be deemed guilty”.

The 2011 amendment by No. 1224 rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 added “knowingly” at the end of the introductory language in (a); in (a)(1), substituted “Accesses” for “Knowingly accesses”; and, in (a)(2), substituted “Releases” for “Knowingly releases”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 845 added “knowingly” at the end of the introductory language in (a); in (a)(1), substituted “Accesses” for “Knowingly accesses” and deleted “willfully” preceding “obtains”; and substituted “Releases” for “Knowingly releases” in (a)(2).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 18; 1975, No. 880, § 1; 1985, No. 544, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-418; Acts 1991, No. 471, § 1; 1995, No. 965, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 75; 2007, No. 262, § 1; 2013, No. 404, § 1; 2013, No. 1293, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5838.